Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1304
Duty to furnish information; subpoenas; report and evaluation assistance.

(1) All agencies, boards, commissions, and departments of the state shall furnish such information, reports, aid, services, and assistance as may be requested by any standing committee of the Legislature in the performance of its duties. A standing committee may issue subpoenas as provided in subsection (3) of section 50-406 to obtain such information, reports, aid, services, and assistance.

(2) The Government, Military and Veterans Affairs Committee of the Legislature shall use its staff and may also request assistance from the Director of Research of the Legislature, the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, or any other division within the Legislature as may be necessary in the performance of the duties set forth in sections 50-1301 to 50-1304.

Laws 1999, LB 298, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 96.